Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.600

Refunds or cancellation of fees—Four-year institutions of higher education.

(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College may refund or cancel in full the tuition and services and activities fees if the student withdraws from a university or college course or program prior to the sixth day of instruction of the quarter or semester for which the fees have been paid or are due. If the student withdraws on or after the sixth day of instruction, the governing boards may refund or cancel up to one-half of the fees, provided such withdrawal occurs within the first thirty calendar days following the beginning of instruction. However, if a different policy is required by federal law in order for the institution of higher education to maintain eligibility for federal funding of programs, the governing board may adopt a refund policy that meets the minimum requirements of the federal law, and the policy may treat all students attending the institution in the same manner. Additionally, if federal law provides that students who receive federal financial aid must return a larger amount to the federal government than that refunded by the institution, the governing board may adopt a refund policy that uses the formula used to calculate the amount returned to the federal government, and the policy may treat all students attending the institution in the same manner.

(2) The governing boards of the respective universities and college may adopt rules for the refund of tuition and fees for courses or programs that begin after the start of the regular quarter or semester.

(3) The governing boards may extend the refund or cancellation period for students who withdraw for medical reasons, shall adopt policies that comply with RCW 28B.10.270 for students who are called into the military service of the United States, and may refund other fees pursuant to such rules as they may prescribe.

[ 2004 c 161 s 2; 2003 c 319 s 1; 1995 c 36 s 1; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 22; 1991 c 164 s 5; 1985 c 390 s 32; 1983 c 256 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 40; 1973 1st ex.s. c 46 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.15.600. Prior: 1963 c 89 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.76.430.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 161: See note following RCW 28B.10.270.

Effective date—1995 c 36: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 13, 1995]." [ 1995 c 36 s 3.]

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 46: See note following RCW 28B.10.704.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 279: See note following RCW 28B.15.005.